Tennessee, session 114, SB2660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-517(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A person who recklessly, by any means of communication, makes a valid
and credible threat to commit an act of mass violence on school property or at a school-
related activity commits a Class E felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2701(c)(7)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Assessment of individuals exhibiting behavior that may present a threat to
the health or safety of the individual or others. If the individual to be assessed is a
student, then the procedure must include an assessment performed by a mental
healthcare provider. The assessment may be performed by telehealth and must
evaluate the welfare of the child. The mental healthcare provider must provide a written
assessment of the student's mental health to the threat team. As used in this
subdivision (c)(7)(A), "mental healthcare provider" means:
(i) A psychiatrist;
(ii) A physician with expertise in psychiatry as determined by training,
education, or experience;
(iii) An advanced practice registered nurse with special certification in
mental health or psychiatric nursing;
SB2660
010988
- 1 -

(iv) An advanced practice registered nurse with expertise in mental
health or psychiatric nursing as determined by training, education, or experience;
(v) A psychologist with health service provider designation;
(vi) A senior psychological examiner;
(vii) A licensed professional counselor;
(viii) A licensed clinical social worker; or
(ix) A school psychologist;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2704, is amended by deleting
the language "threat of violence" wherever it appears and substituting "valid and credible threat
of violence".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3401(g)(5), is amended by
deleting the language "valid threat" wherever it appears and substituting "valid and credible
threat".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4301(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) A director of schools or the head of a public charter school who has
knowledge of a valid and credible threat of mass violence on school property or at a
school-related activity pursuant to § 39-16-517 made by a student shall immediately
report such action to the municipal or metropolitan police department or sheriff's
department having jurisdiction. A threat of mass violence is valid and credible for
purposes of this subdivision (a)(3) if such a determination is made based on the results
of the threat assessment required in § 49-6-3401(g)(5).
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010988